ro-RO: Metoda de decofeinizare: Dioxid de carbon; Acetat de etil (trestie de zahăr); Clorură de metilen; Apă de munte; Swiss Water; Altele
cs: Způsob dekofeinace: Oxid uhličitý; Ethylacetát (cukrová třtina); Dichlormethan; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Jiné
zh-CN: 脱咖啡因工艺: 二氧化碳; 乙酸乙酯（甘蔗）; 二氯甲烷; 山泉水处理法 (Mountain Water); 瑞士水处理法 (Swiss Water); 其他
fr: Méthode de décaféination: Dioxyde de carbone; Acétate d'éthyle (canne à sucre); Chlorure de méthylène; Eau de montagne; Swiss Water; Autre
es: Método de descafeinización: Dióxido de carbono; Acetato de etilo (caña de azúcar); Cloruro de metileno; Agua de montaña; Swiss Water; Otro
de: Entkoffeinierungsmethode: Kohlenstoffdioxid; Ethylacetat (Zuckerrohr); Methylenchlorid; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Sonstige
en: Decaffeination method: Carbon Dioxide; Ethyl Acetate (Sugarcane); Methylene Chloride; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Other
sl-SI: Način odstranjevanja kofeina: Ogljikov dioksid; Etil acetat (sladkorni trs); Metilen klorid; Gorska voda; Swiss Water; Drugo
nl: Cafeïneverwijdering methode: Koolstofdioxide; Ethylacetaat (suikerriet); Methyleenchloride; Bergwater; Swiss Water; Overige
vi: Phương pháp khử caffeine: Carbon dioxide; Etyl axetat (mía); Metylen clorua; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Khác
pl: Metoda dekofeinizacji: Dwutlenek węgla; Octan etylu (trzcina cukrowa); Chlorek metylenu; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Inne
ru: Способ декофеинизации: Диоксид углерода; Этилацетат (сахарный тростник); Метиленхлорид; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Другое
pt-PT: Método de descafeinização: Dióxido de carbono; Acetato de etilo (cana-de-açúcar); Cloreto de metileno; Água da montanha; Swiss Water; Outro
el: Μέθοδος αποκαφεϊνοποίησης: Διοξείδιο του άνθρακα; Οξικός αιθυλεστέρας (από ζαχαροκάλαμο); Χλωριούχο μεθυλένιο; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Άλλο
lt-LT: Dekofeinizavimo metodas: Anglies dioksidas; Etilo acetatas (cukranendrių); Metileno chloridas; Kalnų vandens metodas; Šveicariško vandens metodas; Kita
th: วิธีการกำจัดคาเฟอีน: คาร์บอนไดออกไซด์; เอทิลอะซีเตต (อ้อย); เมทิลีนคลอไรด์; กระบวนการสกัดด้วยน้ำแบบ Mountain Water; กระบวนการสกัดด้วยน้ำแบบ Swiss Water; อื่นๆ
nb: Dekaffineringsmetode: Karbondioksid; Etylacetat (sukkerrør); Metylenklorid; Fjellvann; Swiss Water; Annet
ko: 카페인 제거 방법: 이산화탄소 공법; 에틸 아세테이트(사탕수수); 염화 메틸렌; 마운틴 워터; 스위스 워터; 기타
sv: Avkoffeineringsmetod: Koldioxid; Etylacetat (sockerrör); Metylenklorid; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Övrigt
zh-TW: 脫咖啡因方法: 二氧化碳; 乙酸乙酯 (甘蔗); 二氯甲烷; 山泉水處理法; 瑞士水處理法; 其他
bg-BG: Метод за декофеинизиране: Въглероден диоксид; Етилацетат (захарна тръстика); Метиленхлорид; Планинска вода; Швейцарска вода; Други
pt-BR: Método de descafeinação: Dióxido de carbono; Acetato de etila (Cana-de-açúcar); Cloreto de metileno; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Outro
da: Metode til fjernelse af koffein: Kuldioxid; Ethylacetat (sukkerrør); Methylenchlorid; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Andet
hr-HR: Metoda dekofeinizacije: Ugljikov dioksid; Etil acetat (šećerna trska); Metilen klorid; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Ostalo
tr: Kafeinsizleştirme yöntemi: Karbondioksit; Etil asetat (şeker kamışı); Metilen klorür; Dağ suyu; İsviçre suyu; Diğer
fi: Kofeiinin poistomenetelmä: Hiilidioksidi; Etyyliasetaatti (sokeriruoko); Metyleenikloridi; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Muu
sk-SK: Metóda odstraňovania kofeínu: Oxid uhličitý; Etylacetát (z cukrovej trstiny); Dichlórmetán; Horská voda; Švajčiarska voda; Iné
it: Metodo di decaffeinizzazione: Anidride carbonica; Acetato di etile (canna da zucchero); Cloruro di metilene; Mountain Water; Swiss Water; Altro
ja: カフェイン除去方法: 二酸化炭素抽出; 酢酸エチル (サトウキビ); 塩化メチレン; マウンテンウォーター製法; スイスウォーター製法; その他
hu: Koffeinmentesítési módszer: Szén-dioxid; Etil-acetát (cukornád); Metilén-klorid; Hegyi víz; Svájci víz; Egyéb